District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1507

Certified public accountants — Requirements.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 8, 24 DCR 5975
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-40, § 2, 42 DCR 3275
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-107.
1973 Ed., § 2-947.
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.